Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for violent crime enforcement teams. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end